District of Columbia statutes.
1-1329

Mayor to revise fees for Surveyor; notice of revision of fee schedule; inspection of fee schedule; employment of registered land surveyor.

(a)

(1)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may establish and revise the fees and additional charges for services rendered by the Surveyor of the District of Columbia. The fees shall be established by the Mayor in such amounts as, in the Mayor’s judgment, will be commensurate with the cost to the District of Columbia for providing the services rendered by the Office of the Surveyor. The schedule of fees established by the Mayor shall be available for inspection in the Office of the Surveyor.

(2)

The proposed rules issued pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be submitted to the Council for a 30-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 90-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

(a-1)

Repealed.

(b)

Any person may request in writing that the Surveyor perform any survey or prepare any plat authorized by this chapter. The Surveyor may complete and may record any survey within 60 days after a written request for survey is filed. Except for those surveying or other functions, duties or obligations specifically reserved to the Surveyor in this chapter, any person may employ, at his expense, a registered land surveyor to perform any survey or prepare any plat authorized by this chapter. Such registered land surveyor employed pursuant to this subsection shall perform the survey under the direction of and in accordance with procedures established by the Surveyor. This subsection shall not apply to any department or agency of the government of the District of Columbia.

(c)

For the purposes of this section, a “registered land surveyor” shall mean any person or firm licensed under the provisions of subchapter I-B of Chapter 28 of Title 47 approved and permitted by the Office of the Surveyor to prepare and certify surveys and subdivision plats in the District of Columbia, including, but not limited to, registered civil engineers. The Surveyor is authorized to establish and enforce standards and operating procedures for the performance of surveys by registered land surveyors under subsection (b) of this section. The Surveyor is further authorized to establish and maintain a list of approved registered land surveyors who may be utilized by applicants for surveys pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

(d)

The Mayor is authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this section, including rules to authorize the use of private land surveyors to perform surveys or prepare plats.

(e)

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1426, ch. 854, § 1593
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-149, § 2, 25 DCR 7035
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 5005(g), 46 DCR 3142
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2031, 57 DCR 181
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2022, 57 DCR 6242
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9038, 58 DCR 6226
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2022 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 202 of Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-531, August 6, 2010, 57 DCR 8109).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 202 of Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-450, June 28, 2010, 57 DCR 5635).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2031 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2031 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 202 of the Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Temporary Act of 2010 (D.C. Law 18-222, September 24, 2010, law notification 57 DCR 9859).
D.C. Law 19-21 rewrote subsec. (e).
D.C. Law 18-223 rewrote subsec. (a) and repealed subsec. (a-1).
D.C. Law 18-111 added subsecs. (a-1) and (e).
1973 Ed., § 1-629.
1981 Ed., § 1-929.

Short title: Section 2021 of D.C. Law 18-223 provided that subtitle C of title II of the act may be cited as the “Licensing, Permitting, and Corporate Filings Amendment Act of 2010”.

Short title: Section 2030 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle D of title II of the act may be cited as the “Surveyor and Special Review Requests Enhanced Customer Services Amendment Act of 2009”.